nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting: Ankel- og håndleddsstropper; Frivektstilbehør; Frivekter, hantler og kettlebells; Tilbehør til vektløfterbelte; Vektløftingsbelter; Vektløftingshansker og håndstøtter; Tilbehør til vektløftingsmaskiner og treningsbenker; Vektløftingsmaskiner og -stativer; Vektløftingssko; Løftedrakter; Kompresjonsbind for vektløfting
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών: Ιμάντες αστραγάλων & καρπών; Αξεσουάρ ελεύθερων βαρών; Ελεύθερα βάρη, αλτήρες & βαράκια με λαβές; Αξεσουάρ ζωνών άρσης βαρών; Ζώνες άρσης βαρών; Γάντια & υποστηρίγματα χεριών για άρση βαρών; Αξεσουάρ για μηχανήματα άρσης βαρών & πάγκους άσκησης; Μηχανήματα & δοκοί άρσης βαρών; Παπούτσια άρσης βαρών; Μαγιό άρσης βαρών; Μανίκια υποστήριξης άρσης βαρών
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami: Popruhy na kotníky a zápěstí; Přílušenství k činkám; Ruční činky, činky dumbbell a činky kettlebell; Příslušenství ke vzpěračským opaskům; Vzpěračské pásy; Vzpěračské rukavice; Příslušenství ke vzpěracím trenažérům a lavicím; Vzpěrací trenažéry a posilovací stojany; Vzpěračské boty; Vzpěračské dresy; Zpevňovací návleky pro vzpírání
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting: Ankle & Wrist Straps; Free Weight Accessories; Free Weights, Dumbbells & Kettlebells; Weight Lifting Belt Accessories; Weight Lifting Belts; Weight Lifting Gloves & Hand Supports; Weight Lifting Machine & Exercise Bench Accessories; Weight Lifting Machines & Racks; Weight Lifting Shoes; Weight Lifting Singlets; Weight Lifting Support Sleeves
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重: 腳踝與手腕綁帶; 自由重量健身配件; 自由重量、啞鈴和壺鈴; 舉重腰帶配件; 舉重腰帶; 舉重手套/助握帶; 重量訓練機/臥推椅配件; 重量訓練機; 舉重鞋; 舉重連身服; 舉重護套
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso: Tiras para tornozelos e pulsos; Acessórios de pesos; Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells; Acessórios para cintos de levantamento de peso; Cintos para levantamento de peso; Luvas de levantamento de peso; Acessórios para aparelhos para levantamento de peso; Aparelhos e suportes para levantamento de peso; Tênis de levantamento de peso; Macaquinhos para levantamento de peso; Mangas de compressão para levantamento de peso
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega: Remeni za gležanj i zapešće; Dodaci za podesive utege; Podesivi utezi, bučice i girje; Pribor za pojaseve za dizanje utega; Pojasevi za dizanje utega; Rukavice za dizanje utega i oslonci za ruke; Sprava za dizanje utega i pribor za klupu za vježbanje; Sprave i stalci za dizanje utega; Obuća za dizanje utega; Dresovi za dizanje utega; Rukavi za podršku za dizanje utega
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži: Trakovi za gležnje in zapestja; Dodatki za proste uteži; Proste uteži, utežne ročke in uteži z ročaji; Dodatki za pasove za dvigovanje uteži; Pasovi za dvigovanje uteži; Rokavice in opore za roke za dvigovanje uteži; Stroji za dvigovanje uteži in dodatki za klopi za vadbo; Stroji in stojala za dvigovanje uteži; Čevlji za dvigovanje uteži; Majice za dvigovanje uteži; Podporni rokavi za dvigovanje uteži
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก: สายรัดข้อเท้าและข้อมือ; อุปกรณ์ฟรีเวท; ฟรีเวท ดัมเบล และเคตเทิลเบล; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเข็มขัดยกน้ำหนัก; เข็มขัดยกน้ำหนัก; ถุงมือและที่รองมือสำหรับการยกน้ำหนัก; อุปกรณ์เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและม้านั่งออกกำลังกาย; เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและแร็ค; รองเท้ายกน้ำหนัก; ชุดแข่งขันยกน้ำหนัก; ปลอกพยุงกล้ามเนื้อยกน้ำหนัก
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning: Fotleds- och handledsremmar; Tillbehör till fria vikter; Fria vikter, hantlar och kettlebells; Tillbehör för tyngdlyftningsbälten; Träningsbälten; Träningshandskar och handstöd; Tillbehör till styrketräningsmaskiner och -bänkar; Maskiner och ställningar för styrketräning; Tyngdlyftningsskor; Tyngdlyftningstrikåer; Stödsleeves för tyngdlyftning
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ: アンクル＆リストストラップ; フリーウエイト関連用品; フリーウェイト、ダンベル、ケトルベル; ウエイトリフティングベルトアクセサリー; ウェイトリフティング用ベルト; ウェイトリフティング用グローブ; ウェイトリフティングマシン関連用品; ウェイトリフティングマシン; ウェイトリフティングシューズ; ウェイトリフティング用シングレット; ウェイトリフティング用サポートスリーブ
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика: Ремни для щиколоток и запястий; Аксессуары для свободных весов; Свободные веса, гантели и гири; Аксессуары для тяжелоатлетических поясов; Пояса для тяжелой атлетики; Перчатки и кистевые бинты для тяжелой атлетики; Аксессуары для силовых тренажеров и тренировочных скамей; Силовые тренажеры, рамы и стойки; Штангетки и обувь для тяжелой атлетики; Трико для тяжелой атлетики; Суппорты для тяжелой атлетики
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen: Enkel- en polsbanden; Accessoires voor gewichtheffen; Losse gewichten, halters en kettlebells; Accessoires voor gewichthefriemen; Gewichthefriemen; Handschoenen en -steunen voor gewichtheffen; Accessoires voor krachtapparatuur en fitnessbanken; Krachtapparatuur en -rekken; Gewichthefschoenen; Gewichthefsinglets; Gewichthefsleeves
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ: Dây quấn cổ chân và cổ tay; Phụ kiện tạ tay; Tạ không giới hạn trọng lượng, tạ tay & tạ ấm; Phụ kiện đai cử tạ; Đai lưng cử tạ; Găng tay tập tạ & hỗ trợ tay; Phụ kiện giàn & ghế tập tạ; Giàn tập tạ; Giày tập tạ; Đồ cử tạ liền thân; Băng bọc hỗ trợ tập tạ
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동: 발목 및 손목 스트랩; 프리웨이트 부대용품; 프리웨이트/덤벨/케틀벨; 웨이트 리프팅 벨트 액세서리; 역기 운동용 벨트; 역기 운동용 장갑/손목 보호대; 역기 운동 기구/벤치 부대용품; 역기 운동 기구/거치대; 역도화; 역도 싱글릿; 웨이트 리프팅 서포트 슬리브
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów: Opaski na kostki i nadgarstki; Akcesoria do wolnych ciężarów; Ciężarki, hantle i odważniki siłowe; Akcesoria do pasów kulturystycznych; Pasy kulturystyczne; Rękawice i uchwyty do podnoszenia ciężarów; Akcesoria do atlasów i ławek treningowych; Atlasy treningowe i stelaże na ciężary; Buty do podnoszenia ciężarów; Trykoty ciężarowe; Opaski wspierające do podnoszenia ciężarów
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi: Fasce per polsi e caviglie; Accessori per massa muscolare; Pesi, manubri e kettlebell; Accessori per cinture da sollevamento pesi; Cinture per sollevamento pesi; Guanti e polsiere per sollevamento pesi; Accessori per panche e macchine per sollevamento pesi; Macchine e rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi; Scarpe da sollevamento pesi; Body da sollevamento pesi; Manicotti di supporto per sollevamento pesi
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重: 踝部和腕部绑带; 哑铃/杠铃配件; 配重片、哑铃/壶铃; 举重腰带配件; 举重腰带; 举重手套/扶手; 力量训练器械配件; 推举机; 举重鞋; 举重服; 举重护具套
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto: Nilkka- ja rannehihnat; Vapaiden painojen lisätarvikkeet; Vapaat painot, käsipainot, kahvakuulat; Painonnostovöiden lisävarusteet; Painonnostovyöt; Painonnostohanskat ja käsituet; Painonnostolaitteiden ja kuntosalipenkkien lisätarvikkeet; Painonnostolaitteet ja -telineet; Painonnostokengät; Painonnostotrikoot; Painonnoston kompressiotuet
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés: Boka- és csuklópántok; Szabadsúly-kiegészítők; Szabadsúlyok, kézisúlyzók és kettlebellek; Súlyemelőöv-kiegészítők; Súlyemelő övek; Súlyemelő kesztyűk és kéztámaszok; Súlyemelő gépek és edzőpad-kiegészítők; Súlyemelő gépek és állványok; Súlyemelő cipők; Súlyemelő mezek; Súlyemelő ízületvédő szorítók
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning: Ankel- og håndledsstropper; Håndvægte – tilbehør; Frivægte, håndvægte og kettlebells; Tilbehør til vægtløftningsbælter; Vægtløftningsbælter; Handsker og håndstøtter til vægtløftning; Vægtløftningsmaskiner – tilbehør; Vægtløftningsmaskiner; Vægtløftningssko; Vægtløftningsdragter; Støttebind til vægtløftning
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben: Fuß- & Handgelenkschlaufen; Hantelzubehör; Gewichte, Kurzhanteln und Kettlebells; Zubehör für Gewichthebergürtel; Gewichthebergürtel; Gewichtheberhandschuhe & Handgelenkschoner; Zubehör für Krafttrainingsgeräte; Krafttrainingsgeräte; Gewichtheberschuhe; Gewichtheberanzüge; Stützbandagen fürs Gewichtheben
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika: Čiurnos ir riešo dirželiai; Laisvųjų svarsčių priedai; Laisvieji svarsčiai, hanteliai ir girės; Sunkiosios atletikos diržų priedai; Sunkiosios atletikos diržai; Sunkiosios atletikos pirštinės ir rankų sutvirtinimo priemonės; Sunkiosios atletikos treniruoklių ir treniruočių suoliukų priedai; Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai ir stelažai; Svarmenų kilnojimo batai; Svarmenų kilnojimo triko; Svorio kilnojimo pagalbinės rankovės
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma: El ve ayak bileği kayışları; Serbest Ağırlık Aksesuarları; Serbest Ağırlıklar, Dambıllar ve Kettlebell'ler; Ağırlık kemeri aksesuarları; Halter Kemerleri; Ağırlık Kaldırma Eldivenleri ve El Destekleri; Ağırlık Kaldırma Makinesi ve Egzersiz Sehpası Aksesuarları; Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri; Halter ayakkabıları; Halter mayoları; Ağırlık kaldırma destek manşonları
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți: Chingi și curele pentru glezne și încheieturi; Accesorii pentru greutăți libere; Greutăți libere, gantere și kettlebell; Accesorii pentru centuri de haltere; Curele pentru ridicat greutăți; Mănuși și suporturi pentru mâini pentru ridicat greutăți; Accesorii pentru aparate pentru ridicat greutăți și bănci de fitness; Aparate și stații de antrenament pentru ridicat greutăți; Încălțăminte pentru haltere; Maiouri de concurs pentru haltere; Manșoane de suport pentru haltere
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie: Popruhy na členky a zápästia; Vzpieračské činky; Činky, jednoručky a kettlebelly; Príslušenstvo k vzpieračským opaskom; Vzpieračské opasky; Vzpieračské rukavice a chrániče rúk; Príslušenstvo k vzpieračským strojom a lavičkám; Vzpieračské stroje a stojany; Vzpieračské topánky; Vzpieračské tielka; Podporné návleky na posilňovanie
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas: Correas para tobillos y muñecas; Accesorios para pesas libres; Pesas libres, mancuernas y kettlebells; Accesorios para cinturones de levantamiento de pesas; Cinturones para levantar pesas; Guantes y soportes de mano para levantar pesas; Accesorios para máquinas de levantamiento de pesas y bancos de ejercicio; Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas; Zapatillas de levantamiento de pesas; Monos de levantamiento de pesas; Mangas de soporte para levantamiento de pesas
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie: Sangles de chevilles et de poignets; Accessoires de musculation avec des poids libres; Poids libres, haltères et kettlebells; Accessoires de ceintures d'haltérophilie; Ceintures d’haltérophilie; Gants d’haltérophilie et accessoires pour les mains; Accessoires pour machines et bancs d’haltérophilie; Machines d’haltérophilie et supports pour barres; Chaussures d’haltérophilie; Combinaisons d’haltérophilie; Manchons de maintien pour haltérophilie
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести: Каишки за глезени и китки; Аксесоари за свободни тежести; Свободни тежести, дъмбели и пудовки; Аксесоари за колани за вдигане на тежести; Колани за вдигане на тежести; Ръкавици и опори за ръце за вдигане на тежести; Аксесоари за силови уреди и фитнес лежанки; Машини за вдигане на тежести и стойки; Обувки за вдигане на тежести; Трика за вдигане на тежести; Поддържащи ръкави за вдигане на тежести
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo: Correias para tornozelos e pulsos; Acessórios de pesos livres; Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells; Acessórios para cintos de halterofilismo; Cintos para halterofilismo; Suportes de mãos e luvas para halterofilismo; Acessórios para banco de exercício e máquina de halterofilismo; Racks e máquinas de halterofilismo; Ténis de musculação; Fatos de halterofilismo; Mangas de suporte de musculação